New Jersey, session 222, S3100.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Not later than 90 days prior to a pharmacy closure, the pharmacy permit holder or an authorized legal representative of the pharmacy permit holder shall provide written notice of such closure to the governing board of the municipality in which the pharmacy is physically located, in addition to the required notification to the State Board of Pharmacy Office of Drug Control, and the Drug Enforcement Administration. 2.    The Board of Pharmacy shall adopt rules and regulations, in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act, P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), as are necessary to effectuate the provisions of this act. 3.    This act shall take effect immediately.